Idaho, session 2025, S1018.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 54-3405, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-3405. QUALIFICATIONS FOR LICENSURE. (1) Licensure as a "licensed
professional counselor" shall be restricted to persons who:
(a) Have not been convicted, found guilty, or received a withheld judg-
ment or a suspended sentence in this state or in any other state of a
crime that is deemed relevant in accordance with section 67-9411(1),
Idaho Code;
(b) Have submitted to a fingerprint-based criminal history background
check in accordance with section 67-9411A, Idaho Code, if required by
the division of occupational and professional licenses; and
(c) Have successfully completed each of the following requirements:
(i) A master's degree or higher in counseling or a related field
of study, as approved by the board, that includes completion of a
practicum of supervised clinical contact as defined by rule;
(ii) An examination, if required by the board's rules; and
(iii) One thousand (1,000) hours of supervised experience in coun-
seling acceptable to the board.
(2) A license will not be issued to an individual whose license, certi-
fication or registration has been revoked or suspended in this or any other
state and in this or any other related field. Such an individual may not be
licensed under this chapter unless the period of revocation or suspension
has been completed and the board has conducted a competency review and deter-
mined that an acceptable degree of rehabilitation has been accomplished.
SECTION 2. That Section 54-3405A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:


54-3405A. QUALIFICATIONS FOR LICENSURE. Licensure as a "licensed
clinical professional counselor" shall be restricted to persons who:
(1) Hold a valid licensed professional counselor license in good stand-
ing;
(2) Document two thousand (2,000) hours of direct client contact expe-
rience under supervision in no less than a two (2) year period as set forth in
this chapter and the rules of the board;
(3) Successfully complete a written examination as approved by the
board and defined in rules of the board; and
(4) Submit to a fingerprint-based criminal history background check in
accordance with section 67-9411A, Idaho Code, if required by the division of
occupational and professional licenses.
SECTION 3. That Section 54-3405B, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-3405B. QUALIFICATIONS FOR LICENSURE. (1) In addition to such other
information as the board may require by rule, each applicant for licensure as
a licensed associate marriage and family therapist shall:
(a) Hold a master's degree or higher in marriage and family therapy or a
related field of study as approved by the board and complete a practicum
of supervised clinical contact with individuals, couples, families and
other systems as part of the graduate program and as defined by rule;
(b) Submit an application in the form prescribed by the board;
(c) Pay the fee determined by the board by rule;
(d) Provide evidence satisfactory to the board of having successfully
passed an examination approved by the board and defined by rule; and
(e) Submit to a fingerprint-based criminal history background check in
accordance with section 67-9411A, Idaho Code, if required by the divi-
sion of occupational and professional licenses.
(2) A license will not be issued to an individual whose license, certi-
fication or registration has been revoked or suspended in this or any other
state and in this or any other related field. Such an individual may not be
licensed under this chapter unless the period of revocation or suspension
has been completed and the board has conducted a competency review and deter-
mined that an acceptable degree of rehabilitation has been accomplished.
SECTION 4. That Section 54-3405C, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-3405C. QUALIFICATIONS FOR LICENSURE. (1) In addition to such other
information as the board may require by rule, each applicant for licensure as
a licensed marriage and family therapist shall:
(a) Hold a master's degree or higher in marriage and family therapy or a
related field of study as approved by the board and complete a practicum
of supervised clinical contact with individuals, couples, families and
other systems as part of the graduate program and as defined by rule;
(b) Document postgraduate supervised experience in marriage and family
therapy acceptable to the board as defined by rule;
(c) Submit an application in the form prescribed by the board;
(d) Pay the fee determined by the board by rule;


(e) Provide evidence satisfactory to the board of having successfully
passed an examination approved by the board and defined by rule; and
(f) Submit to a fingerprint-based criminal history background check in
accordance with section 67-9411A, Idaho Code, if required by the divi-
sion of occupational and professional licenses.
(2) A license will not be issued to an individual whose license, certi-
fication or registration has been revoked or suspended in this or any other
state and in this or any other related field. Such an individual may not be
licensed under this chapter unless the period of revocation or suspension
has been completed and the board has conducted a competency review and deter-
mined that an acceptable degree of rehabilitation has been accomplished.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.